District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Archdiocese of Washington Parish Real Property, Deed Recordation,
and Transfer Tax Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-1099.16. Archdiocese of Washington parish real property, deed recordation, and
deed transfer tax exemptions.”.
(b) A new section 47-1099.16 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1099.16. Archdiocese of Washington parish real property, deed recordation, and
deed transfer tax exemptions.
“(a) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 159,
Lots 861 and 827, shall be exempt from the taxes imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11
of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Cathedral of St. Matthew the Apostle Catholic
Church, Inc.
“(b) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
1800, Lots 1, 20, and 802; and Square 1815, Lot 101, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by
Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman
Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or
Annunciation Catholic Church, Inc.
“(c) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
3880, Lots 1, 2, 13, 17, 18, 19, 800, 801, 802, 803, 804, and 805 shall be exempt from the tax
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by
the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole,
or St. Anthony of Padua Catholic Church, Inc.
“(d) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
6005, Lots 802 and 803 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter
11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Church of the Assumption of the
Blessed Virgin Mary Catholic Church, Inc.
“(e) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 4558,
Lot 33, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so
long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Benedict the Moor Catholic Church, Inc.
“(f) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 1862,
Lot 802; and Square 1863, Lots 47, 824, 825, and 826, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by
Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman
Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Shrine of
the Most Blessed Sacrament Catholic Church, Inc.
“(g) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
1263, Lot 163 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42 so long as the properties are owned and used by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Epiphany Catholic Church, Inc.
“(h) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
4217, Lot 802; and Square 4217N, Lot 808 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of
this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Francis de
Sales Catholic Church, Inc.
“(i) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 5550,
Lot 808; and Square 5552, Lot 832 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title
and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop
of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Francis Xavier Catholic
Church, Inc.
“(j) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 3224,
Lot 800 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so
long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Gabriel Catholic Church, Inc.
“(k) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
1036, Lots 114, 804, and 805; and Square 1071, Lot 805 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by
Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman
Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy
Comforter - St. Cyprian Catholic Church, Inc.
“(l) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 957,
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Lot 814; and Square 4065, Lot 819 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title
and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop
of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy Name of Jesus Catholic
Church, Inc.
“(m) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 557,
Lot 140 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so
long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy Redeemer Catholic Church, Inc.
“(n) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 566,
Lots 857, 859, 860, and 865, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy Rosary Catholic Church,
Inc.
“(o) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
1227, Lot 95 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or Holy Trinity Catholic Church, Inc.
“(p) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 423,
Lots 2, 801, and 802 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11
of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Immaculate Conception Catholic Church, Inc.
“(q) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
5204, Lot 37 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or Church of the Incarnation Catholic Church, Inc.
“(r) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 756,
Lots 47, 52, 827, and 828 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
Chapter 11 of Title 42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Joseph’s on Capitol Hill
Catholic Church, Inc.
“(s) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 5330,
Lots 24 and 31 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Luke Catholic Church, Inc.
“(t) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 3111,
Lot 806; and Square 3531, Lots 116 and 117 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of
this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Martin of Tours
Catholic Church, Inc.
“(u) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 518,
Lots 911 and 912, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Mary, Mother of God, Catholic Church,
Inc.
“(v) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
2939, Lots 802, 808, and 811 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Nativity Catholic Church, Inc.
“(w) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
5817, Lot 803, and PAR-0226-0037 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title
and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop
of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Our Lady of Perpetual Help
Catholic Church, Inc.
“(x) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in PAR- 0198-
0065 and PAR-0199-0049 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Our Lady Queen of Peace
Catholic Church, Inc.
“(y) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
1374, Lots 859 and 860 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter
11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Our Lady of Victory Catholic
Church, Inc.
“(z) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 376,
Lots 820, 821, 822, and 827 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and
Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Patrick Catholic Church, Inc.
“(aa) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 203
Lot 93; and Square 189 and Lot 45 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title
and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop
of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Augustine Catholic Church,
Inc.
“(bb) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
733, Lot 50; and Square 793, Lot 25 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title
and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop
of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Peter Catholic Church, Inc.
“(cc) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
2675, Lot 826; and Square 2609, Lot 857, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of
this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic
Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Shrine of the
Sacred Heart Catholic Church, Inc.
“(dd) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 27,
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Lot 30 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so
long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Stephen the Martyr Catholic Church, Inc.
“(ee) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
5773, Lot 835; Square 5605, Lot 110; and Square 5780, Lot 821, shall be exempt from the tax
imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by
the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole,
or St. Teresa of Avila Catholic Church, Inc.
“(ff) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
1739, Lot 57 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Louis de France Catholic Church, Inc.
“(gg) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
2529, Lot 305 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or Our Lady Queen of the Americas Catholic Church,
Inc.
“(hh) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
1729, Lot 0007 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Ann Catholic Church, Inc.
“(ii) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
2108, Lot 806, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
Title 42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Thomas Apostle Catholic Church, Inc.
“(jj) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
6242, Lot 834 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Thomas More Catholic Church, Inc.
“(kk) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
698, Lot 818 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42 so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Vincent de Paul Catholic Church, Inc.
“(ll) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 159,
Lot 860 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42, so
long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or Cathedral of St. Matthew the Apostle Catholic
Church, Inc.
“(mm) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
1863, Lot 1 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
his successors in office, a corporation sole, or Shrine of the Most Blessed Sacrament Catholic
Church, Inc.
“(nn) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
4217N, Lot 805 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of
Title 42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington
and his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Francis de Sales Catholic Church, Inc.
“(oo) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square
376, Lot 828 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title
42, so long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and
his successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Patrick Catholic Church, Inc.
“(pp) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located in Square 203,
Lot 806 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 9 of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42, so
long as the properties are owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his
successors in office, a corporation sole, or St. Augustine Catholic Church, Inc.
“(qq) The tax exemptions provided pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and not
lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the Roman Catholic
Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, and the respective
parishes of the Archdiocese of Washington as named in subsections (a) through (pp).
“(rr) The properties listed in subsections (a) through (pp) may be transferred through
supplemental deeds, for no additional consideration, from the Roman Catholic Archbishop of
Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, as the record owner, to the
respective parishes of the Archdiocese of Washington as named in subsections (a) through (pp),
and any such supplemental deed transfers shall be exempt from the taxes imposed by Chapter 9
of this title and Chapter 11 of Title 42, and shall not require the submission of real property tax
exemption applications.
“(ss) Each of the real properties listed in subsections (a) through (kk) shall remain exempt
from taxation imposed by Chapter 8 of this title under § 47-1002 so long as the property is
owned by the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a
corporation sole, or the respective parishes of the Archdiocese of Washington as named in
subsections (a) through (kk), and provided that such owner, or any lessee, continues to use the
property as listed in subsections (a) through (kk) to provide religious, charitable, educational, or
related services, subject to any applicable provisions of § 47-1005 for any taxable portion of the
property. If any or all of the properties listed in subsections (a) through (kk) are transferred through
supplemental deed pursuant to subsection (rr), for no additional consideration, from the Roman
Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in office, a corporation sole, as the record
owner, to the respective parishes of the Archdiocese of Washington as named in subsections (a)
through (kk), the properties in question shall remain exempt from taxation under § 47-1002,
subject to any applicable provisions of § 47-1005 for any taxable portion of the property.
“(tt) Annually the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Washington and his successors in
office, a corporation sole, or the respective parishes of the Archdiocese of Washington as named
in subsections (a) through (kk), shall make the reports required by § 47-1007, as applicable, and
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
shall have the appeal rights provided by § 47-1009.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
7